Maryland, session 2026, HB0856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–103.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “NATIONAL MEMBERSHIP ORGANIZATION” MEANS A
NATIONAL ORGANIZATION THAT IS A NATIONAL COLLECTION POINT FOR
PROFESSIONAL DISCIPLINE ACTIONS TAKEN BY ALL 50 STATES, THE DISTRICT OF
COLUMBIA, THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY
SCHOOLS, AND GUAM THAT PROVIDES MEMBERS WITH NOTIFICATION OF AN ACTION
TAKEN AGAINST THE CREDENTIAL OF AN EDUCATOR BY OTHER MEMBER STATES OR
JURISDICTIONS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) REGISTER EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IN THE STATE AS AN
ASSOCIATE MEMBER OF A NATIONAL MEMBERSHIP ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES
ACCESS TO THE EDUCATOR IDENTIFICATION CLEARINGHOUSE; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 362 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) PAY ANY APPLICABLE FEES AND DUES ASSOCIATED WITH
MEMBERSHIP IN THE NATIONAL MEMBERSHIP ORGANIZATION.
(C) EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IN THE STATE SHALL:
(1) UTILIZE THE EDUCATOR IDENTIFICATION CLEARINGHOUSE
THROUGH THE NATIONAL MEMBERSHIP ORGANIZATION TO SCREEN EACH
INDIVIDUAL WHO RECEIVES, ON OR AFTER OCTOBER AUGUST 1, 2026, AN OFFER OF
EMPLOYMENT FROM THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM FOR AN EDUCATOR POSITION
THAT REQUIRES A LICENSE; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT EACH INDIVIDUAL WHO RECEIVES AN OFFER
SPECIFIED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) APPLIES FOR THE APPROPRIATE LICENSE AFTER THE
OFFER OF EMPLOYMENT AND BEFORE THE START OF EMPLOYMENT; AND
(II) OBTAINS THE APPROPRIATE LICENSE BEFORE ANY
INTERACTION WITH CHILDREN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That nothing in this Act may be
construed to impair or effect the requirements of § 6–113 of the Education Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –